Utah statutes.
53A-1-801.   Child literacy program -- Coordinated activities.
(1)  The State Board of Education, through the state superintendent of public
instruction, shall provide for a public service campaign to educate parents on
the importance of providing their children with opportunities to develop
emerging literacy skills through a statewide "Read to Me" program.
(2)  The board shall coordinate its activities under this section with other
state and community entities that are engaged in child literacy programs in
order to maximize its efforts and resources, including the Utah Commission on
National and Community Service.
